Illinois, session 104th, HB476.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 510-20.21 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.21)7    Sec. 10-20.21. Contracts. 8    (a) To award all contracts for purchase of supplies and 9materials or work involving an expenditure in excess of 10$35,000 or a lower amount as required by board policy to the 11lowest responsible bidder, considering conformity with 12specifications, terms of delivery, quality and serviceability, 13after due advertisement, except the following: 14        (i) contracts for the services of individuals 15    possessing a high degree of professional skill where the 16    ability or fitness of the individual plays an important 17    part; 18        (ii) contracts for the printing of finance committee 19    reports and departmental reports; 20        (iii) contracts for the printing or engraving of 21    bonds, tax warrants and other evidences of indebtedness; 22        (iv) contracts for the purchase of perishable foods 23    and perishable beverages;   HB0476 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 04292 LNS 14317 b1        (v) contracts for materials and work which have been 2    awarded to the lowest responsible bidder after due 3    advertisement, but due to unforeseen revisions, not the 4    fault of the contractor for materials and work, must be 5    revised causing expenditures not in excess of 10% of the 6    contract price; 7        (vi) contracts for the maintenance or servicing of, or 8    provision of repair parts for, equipment which are made 9    with the manufacturer or authorized service agent of that 10    equipment where the provision of parts, maintenance, or 11    servicing can best be performed by the manufacturer or 12    authorized service agent; 13        (vii) purchases and contracts for the use, purchase, 14    delivery, movement, or installation of data processing 15    equipment, software, or services and telecommunications 16    and interconnect equipment, software, and services; 17        (viii) contracts for duplicating machines and 18    supplies; 19        (ix) contracts for the purchase of fuel, including 20    diesel, gasoline, oil, aviation, natural gas, or propane, 21    lubricants, or other petroleum products; 22        (x) purchases of equipment previously owned by some 23    entity other than the district itself; 24        (xi) contracts for repair, maintenance, remodeling, 25    renovation, or construction, or a single project involving 26    an expenditure not to exceed $50,000 and not involving a   HB0476 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 04292 LNS 14317 b1    change or increase in the size, type, or extent of an 2    existing facility; 3        (xii) contracts for goods or services procured from 4    another governmental agency; 5        (xiii) contracts for goods or services which are 6    economically procurable from only one source, such as for 7    the purchase of magazines, books, periodicals, pamphlets 8    and reports, and for utility services such as water, 9    light, heat, telephone or telegraph; 10        (xiv) where funds are expended in an emergency and 11    such emergency expenditure is approved by 3/4 of the 12    members of the board; 13        (xv) State master contracts authorized under Article 14    28A of this Code; 15        (xvi) contracts providing for the transportation of 16    pupils, which contracts must be advertised in the same 17    manner as competitive bids and awarded by first 18    considering the bidder or bidders most able to provide 19    safety and comfort for the pupils, stability of service, 20    and any other factors set forth in the request for 21    proposal regarding quality of service, and then price; and22        (xvii) contracts for goods, services, or management in 23    the operation of a school's food service, including a 24    school that participates in any of the United States 25    Department of Agriculture's child nutrition programs if a 26    good faith effort is made on behalf of the school district   HB0476 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 04292 LNS 14317 b1    to give preference to:2            (1) contracts that procure food that promotes the 3        health and well-being of students, in compliance with 4        United States Department of Agriculture nutrition 5        standards for school meals. Contracts should also 6        promote the production of scratch made, minimally 7        processed foods;8            (2) contracts that give a preference to State, or 9        regional, or local suppliers that source local food 10        products;11            (3) contracts that give a preference to food 12        suppliers that utilize producers that adopt hormone 13        and pest management practices recommended by the 14        United States Department of Agriculture;15            (4) contracts that give a preference to food 16        suppliers that value animal welfare; and 17            (5) contracts that increase opportunities for 18        businesses owned and operated by minorities, women, or 19        persons with disabilities.20    Food supplier data shall be submitted to the school 21    district at the time of the bid, to the best of the 22    bidder's ability, and updated annually thereafter during 23    the term of the contract. The contractor shall submit the 24    updated food supplier data. The data required under this 25    item (xvii) shall include the name and address of each 26    supplier, distributor, processor, and producer involved in   HB0476 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 04292 LNS 14317 b1    the provision of the products that the bidder is to 2    supply. 3However, at no time shall a cause of action lie against a 4school board for awarding a pupil transportation contract per 5the standards set forth in this subsection (a) unless the 6cause of action is based on fraudulent conduct. 7    All competitive bids for contracts involving an 8expenditure in excess of $35,000 or a lower amount as required 9by board policy must be sealed by the bidder and must be opened 10by a member or employee of the school board at a public bid 11opening at which the contents of the bids must be announced. 12Each bidder must receive at least 3 days' notice of the time 13and place of the bid opening. For purposes of this Section due 14advertisement includes, but is not limited to, at least one 15public notice at least 10 days before the bid date in a 16newspaper published in the district, or if no newspaper is 17published in the district, in a newspaper of general 18circulation in the area of the district. State master 19contracts and certified education purchasing contracts, as 20defined in Article 28A of this Code, are not subject to the 21requirements of this paragraph. 22    Under this Section, the acceptance of bids sealed by a 23bidder and the opening of these bids at a public bid opening 24may be permitted by an electronic process for communicating, 25accepting, and opening competitive bids. An electronic bidding 26process must provide for, but is not limited to, the following   HB0476 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 04292 LNS 14317 b1safeguards:2        (1) On the date and time certain of a bid opening, the 3    primary person conducting the competitive, sealed, 4    electronic bid process shall log onto a specified database 5    using a unique username and password previously assigned 6    to the bidder to allow access to the bidder's specific bid 7    project number.8        (2) The specified electronic database must be on a 9    network that (i) is in a secure environment behind a 10    firewall; (ii) has specific encryption tools; (iii) 11    maintains specific intrusion detection systems; (iv) has 12    redundant systems architecture with data storage back-up, 13    whether by compact disc or tape; and (v) maintains a 14    disaster recovery plan. 15It is the legislative intent of Public Act 96-841 to maintain 16the integrity of the sealed bidding process provided for in 17this Section, to further limit any possibility of bid-rigging, 18to reduce administrative costs to school districts, and to 19effect efficiencies in communications with bidders. 20    (b) To require, as a condition of any contract for goods 21and services, that persons bidding for and awarded a contract 22and all affiliates of the person collect and remit Illinois 23Use Tax on all sales of tangible personal property into the 24State of Illinois in accordance with the provisions of the 25Illinois Use Tax Act regardless of whether the person or 26affiliate is a "retailer maintaining a place of business   HB0476 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 04292 LNS 14317 b1within this State" as defined in Section 2 of the Use Tax Act. 2For purposes of this Section, the term "affiliate" means any 3entity that (1) directly, indirectly, or constructively 4controls another entity, (2) is directly, indirectly, or 5constructively controlled by another entity, or (3) is subject 6to the control of a common entity. For purposes of this 7subsection (b), an entity controls another entity if it owns, 8directly or individually, more than 10% of the voting 9securities of that entity. As used in this subsection (b), the 10term "voting security" means a security that (1) confers upon 11the holder the right to vote for the election of members of the 12board of directors or similar governing body of the business 13or (2) is convertible into, or entitles the holder to receive 14upon its exercise, a security that confers such a right to 15vote. A general partnership interest is a voting security.16    To require that bids and contracts include a certification 17by the bidder or contractor that the bidder or contractor is 18not barred from bidding for or entering into a contract under 19this Section and that the bidder or contractor acknowledges 20that the school board may declare the contract void if the 21certification completed pursuant to this subsection (b) is 22false.23    (b-5) To require all contracts and agreements that pertain 24to goods and services and that are intended to generate 25additional revenue and other remunerations for the school 26district in excess of $1,000, including without limitation   HB0476 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 04292 LNS 14317 b1vending machine contracts, sports and other attire, class 2rings, and photographic services, to be approved by the school 3board. The school board shall file as an attachment to its 4annual budget a report, in a form as determined by the State 5Board of Education, indicating for the prior year the name of 6the vendor, the product or service provided, and the actual 7net revenue and non-monetary remuneration from each of the 8contracts or agreements. In addition, the report shall 9indicate for what purpose the revenue was used and how and to 10whom the non-monetary remuneration was distributed. 11    (b-10) To prohibit any contract to purchase food with a 12bidder or offeror if the bidder's or offeror's contract terms 13prohibit the school from donating food to food banks, 14including, but not limited to, homeless shelters, food 15pantries, and soup kitchens.16    (c) If the State education purchasing entity creates a 17master contract as defined in Article 28A of this Code, then 18the State education purchasing entity shall notify school 19districts of the existence of the master contract. 20    (d) In purchasing supplies, materials, equipment, or 21services that are not subject to subsection (c) of this 22Section, before a school district solicits bids or awards a 23contract, the district may review and consider as a bid under 24subsection (a) of this Section certified education purchasing 25contracts that are already available through the State 26education purchasing entity.  HB0476 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 04292 LNS 14317 b1(Source: P.A. 102-1101, eff. 6-29-22; 103-8, eff. 1-1-24.)